Idaho statutes. Title 44 LABOR
Chapter 11
DAY’S WORK

Sec.

§ 44-1101 — 44-1103. Public work — Contracts — Eight hour day — Exceptions — Wage rate — Penalty for false certificate. [Repealed.]

§ 44-1104 — 44-1107. Mines — Smelters — Eight hours a day’s work — Penalty for violating act — Female employees. [Repealed.]

§ 44-1108, 44-1109. Female employees — Seats to be furnished — Act to be posted — Penalty for violation. [Repealed.]